Missouri, session 2026, HB2663.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 217 and 558, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 217.738 and 558.500, to read as follows:
217.738. 1. Any offender receiving a reduction of sentence under section 558.500
shall be granted a hearing before the parole board.
2. In addition to meeting all other requirements of this chapter, for an offender
receiving a reduction of sentence under section 558.500 to be eligible for supervised
release as a condition of parole, the offender shall provide to the board the following:
(1) At least five statements from current or former department of corrections
employees attesting to the offender's demonstration of institutional adaptability and the
offender's conduct in the correctional center;
(2) Signed statements of at least twenty residents of the community where the
offender will reside upon release supporting the offender's release and who commit to
providing assistance with the offender's reentry into the community; and
(3) A safe and secure home plan for implementation upon the offender's release.
558.500. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
sentencing court may, upon petition, reduce a sentence of life without eligibility for
probation or parole, or reduce a sentence of thirty years or greater, to a sentence of life
with eligibility for probation or parole if the court determines that:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2663 2
(1) The convicted person has served at least thirty years in the department of
corrections;
(2) The convicted person was under twenty years of age at the time the offense
was committed; and
(3) Since the commission of the offense the convicted person has:
(a) Made reasonable efforts toward rehabilitation by successfully completing
rehabilitation programs, which may include, but shall not be limited to, substance abuse
treatment, effective communication classes, victim impact classes, vocational training,
correspondence courses to obtain a degree or diploma, or acquiring job skills; and
(b) Exhibited model citizen behavior within his or her correctional facility,
which may include, but shall not be limited to, maintaining sobriety or demonstrating
sober living; demonstrating traits of leadership; and attending education-based
activities, which may include, but shall not be limited to, coursework relating to
victim impact, restorative justice, substance abuse treatment, or effective
communication.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the division of
probation and parole shall supervise any convicted person receiving a reduction of
sentence under subsection 1 of this section for the duration of the convicted person's
natural life.
✔